Vermont, session 2025-2026, H697.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 3020 is added to read:
§ 3020. PUBLIC ENGAGEMENT WITH FIRST RESPONDERS DURING
PUBLIC SAFETY EMERGENCIES
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Emotional distress” means significant mental suffering or distress
that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional
treatment or counseling.
(2) “First responder” includes any law enforcement officer certified by
the Vermont Criminal Justice Council pursuant to 20 V.S.A. § 2358, firefighter
VT LEG #384971 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.697
2026 Page 2 of 3
as defined in 20 V.S.A. § 3151(3), and emergency medical personnel as
defined in 24 V.S.A. § 2651.
(3) “Harass” means to engage purposefully in a course of conduct
directed at a first responder that would cause a reasonable person substantial
emotional distress and that is not otherwise legally permitted.
(4) “Public safety emergency” means an acute event in which a first
responder must engage in the lawful performance of a legal duty to address an
immediate threat to public health or safety.
(b)(1) It is unlawful for a person to intentionally remain or come within 25
feet of the first responder during a public safety emergency:
(A) after the first responder verbally identifies as a first responder;
(B) after receiving a verbal warning from the first responder not to
approach the first responder; and
(C) with the intent to:
(i) obstruct or impede the first responder’s ability to perform the
first responder’s duties;
(ii) threaten the first responder with physical harm; or
(iii) harass the first responder.
(2) A person who is convicted of a violation of this section shall be
imprisoned not more than 60 days or fined not more than $500.00, or both.
VT LEG #384971 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.697
2026 Page 3 of 3
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #384971 v.1